Florida, session 2026, HB565.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
23
24 Section 1. Subsections (46) and (47) of section 393.063,
25 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (47) and (48),
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 565 2026 Legislature
26 respectively, subsection (11) is amended, and a new subsection
27 (46) is added to that section, to read:
28 393.063 Definitions.—For the purposes of this chapter, the
29 term:
30 (11) "Developmental disability" means a disorder or
31 syndrome that is attributable to intellectual disability,
32 cerebral palsy, autism, spina bifida, Down syndrome, Phelan-
33 McDermid syndrome, or Prader-Willi syndrome, or Tatton-Brown-
34 Rahman syndrome; that manifests before the age of 18; and that
35 constitutes a substantial handicap that can reasonably be
36 expected to continue indefinitely.
37 (46) "Tatton-Brown-Rahman syndrome" means a disorder
38 caused by a mutation in the DNMT3A gene typified by mild to
39 severe intellectual disability, macrocephaly, stature and weight
40 that is greater than or equal to two or more standard deviations
41 above the mean for the person's age and sex, and any of the
42 following features presenting in infancy, childhood, or
43 adolescence:
44 (a) Mild facial dysmorphism.
45 (b) Joint hypermobility.
46 (c) Hypotonia.
47 (d) Kyphoscoliosis.
48 (e) Seizures.
49 (f) Cryptorchidism.
50 (g) Deficits in behavior.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 565 2026 Legislature
51 (h) Hematologic malignancies.
52 Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 393.0655, Florida
53 Statutes, is amended to read:
54 393.0655 Screening of direct service providers.—
55 (1) MINIMUM STANDARDS.—The agency shall require level 2
56 employment screening pursuant to chapter 435 for direct service
57 providers who are unrelated to their clients, including support
58 coordinators, and all employees managers and supervisors of
59 residential facilities or adult day training programs licensed
60 under this chapter and any other persons, including volunteers,
61 who provide care or services, who have access to a client's
62 living areas, or who have access to a client's funds or personal
63 property. Background screening must include employment history
64 checks as provided in s. 435.03(1) and local criminal records
65 checks through local law enforcement agencies.
66 (a) A volunteer who assists on an intermittent basis for
67 less than 10 hours per month does not have to be screened if a
68 person who meets the screening requirement of this section is
69 always present and has the volunteer within his or her line of
70 sight.
71 (b) Licensed physicians, nurses, or other professionals
72 licensed and regulated by the Department of Health are not
73 subject to background screening pursuant to this section if they
74 are providing a service that is within their scope of licensed
75 practice.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 565 2026 Legislature
76 (c) A person selected by the family or the individual with
77 developmental disabilities and paid by the family or the
78 individual to provide supports or services is not required to
79 have a background screening under this section.
80 (d) Persons 12 years of age or older, including family
81 members, residing with a direct services provider who provides
82 services to clients in his or her own place of residence are
83 subject to background screening; however, such persons who are
84 12 to 18 years of age shall be screened for delinquency records
85 only.
86 Section 3. (1)(a) For purposes of enhancing the quality,
87 capacity, and consistency of waiver support coordination
88 services, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities shall
89 contract with a state university to develop and administer
90 surveys regarding waiver support coordination services. The
91 university shall administer surveys to owners and operators of
92 all qualified organizations in this state; support coordinators
93 currently employed by a qualified organization; and iBudget
94 clients and their parents, caregivers, or legal guardians.
95 1. The surveys must, at a minimum, solicit data and input
96 regarding:
97 a. The quality, consistency, and accessibility of services
98 provided by support coordinators.
99 b. Attributes and behaviors that define high-quality
100 support coordination.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 565 2026 Legislature
101 c. Best practices and areas for improvement.
102 d. Quantitative and qualitative metrics suitable for
103 assessing support coordinator performance.
104 e. Any other factors deemed pertinent by the university or
105 the agency to improve service delivery.
106 2. Surveys of qualified organizations must also
107 specifically address:
108 a. Professional and educational prerequisites established
109 by the organization for employment as a support coordinator.
110 b. Methods used to assess core competencies.
111 c. The efficacy of the mentoring program required under s.
112 393.0663(2)(b), Florida Statutes.
113 d. Operational and systemic challenges with recruitment
114 and retention of qualified support coordinators.
115 3. Surveys of individual waiver support coordinators must
116 also specifically address:
117 a. Individual caseload ratios, capacity, and geographic
118 service areas.
119 b. The efficacy of the mentoring program required under s.
120 393.0663(2)(b), Florida Statutes.
121 c. Operational and systemic challenges to delivery of
122 effective support coordination.
123 4. Surveys of iBudget clients and their parents,
124 caregivers, or legal guardians must also specifically address
125 satisfaction with support coordination services.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 565 2026 Legislature
126 (b) By October 1, 2026, the state university must submit a
127 final report to the agency, including a compilation and analysis
128 of the survey results.
129 (2) The agency shall solicit input on enhancing support
130 coordinator quality, capacity and consistency from the whole
131 community of waiver program stakeholders, and shall conduct at
132 least one publicly noticed hearing for this purpose in each
133 service region.
134 (3) The agency shall conduct or contract for a gap
135 analysis to assess the geographic distribution and caseload
136 capacity of waiver support coordinators across this state.
137 (4) Using the information gathered under this section, the
138 agency shall identify specific core competencies for waiver
139 support coordinators, identify specific performance metrics to
140 assess those core competencies, and make recommendations on how
141 to standardize their assessment. By February 15, 2027, the
142 agency shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of
143 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on
144 its findings and recommendations, and include the full report
145 submitted by the state university under subsection (1).
146 (5) This section shall take effect upon becoming a law.
147 Section 4. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
148 act, and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
149 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1,
150 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb565 -02-er